District of Columbia statutes.
8-1776.02

Smart lighting study.

(a)

Within 270 days after March 3, 2010, DDOE shall submit a report to the Council recommending strategies and standards for optimal lighting methods and levels in the District. The report shall address:

(1)

Public safety;

(2)

Energy efficiency;

(3)

Cost efficiency;

(4)

Effects on environmental health; and

(5)

Aesthetics.

(b)

In producing the report required by subsection (a) of this section, DDOE shall:

(1)

Consult with civil servants who have technical expertise and work for the Office of Planning, the Department of General Services, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the District Department of Transportation, the Metropolitan Police Department, the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, and appropriate federal authorities, including the General Services Administration, the Architect of the Capitol, and the National Capital Planning Commission;

(2)

Solicit input from the public; and

(3)

Evaluate recognized lighting standards, including standards promulgated by the Illuminating Engineering Society and the International Dark Sky Association.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1042, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 63, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Property Management” in (b)(1).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1042 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1042 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).